District of Columbia statutes.
4-561.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Case Review Subcommittee” means the Sexual Assault Response Team Case Review Subcommittee established by § 4-561.14.

(2)

“DC Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program” or “DC SANE Program” means the program that provides comprehensive care to adult victims of rape, sexual assault, and other sex crimes, operated by the OVS, in collaboration with the Network for Victim Recovery DC (or its successor entity), and the Medstar Washington Hospital Center (or its successor entity), where medical forensic exams are conducted.

(3)

“DFS” means the Department of Forensic Sciences.

(4)

“Hospital” means the MedStar Washington Hospital Center, or any medical facility where a forensic nurse examiner conducts a sexual assault forensic evaluation of the sexual assault victim.

(5)

“Independent expert consultant” or “consultant” means an independent contractor retained on a contract basis by OVS to assess and review the MPD’s response to reports of sexual assault and to ensure that all aspects of the MPD’s sexual assault investigations and training are based on current best practices, are implemented properly, and have a victim-centered approach.

(6)

“MPD” means the Metropolitan Police Department.

(7)

“OCME” means the Office of the Chief Medical Examiner.

(8)

“OVS” means the Office of Victim Services.

(9)

“SART” means the Sexual Assault Response Team established by § 4-561.12.

(10)

“Sexual assault” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 23-1907(7).

(11)

“Sexual assault victim” means an individual 18 years of age or older against whom sexual assault has been committed or is alleged to have been committed.

(12)

“Task Force” means the Sexual Assault Victim Rights Task Force established by § 4-561.15.

Nov. 20, 2014, D.C. Law 20-139, § 201, 61 DCR 5913

History